Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-802
Pandering; penalty.

(1) A person commits pandering if such person:

(a) Entices another person to become a prostitute;

(b) Procures or harbors therein an inmate for a house of prostitution or for any place where prostitution is practiced or allowed;

(c) Inveigles, entices, persuades, encourages, or procures any person to come into or leave this state for the purpose of prostitution or debauchery; or

(d) Receives or gives or agrees to receive or give any money or other thing of value for procuring or attempting to procure any person to become a prostitute or commit an act of prostitution or come into this state or leave this state for the purpose of prostitution or debauchery.

(2) Pandering is a Class II felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 158;

Laws 2012, LB1145, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB255, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB294, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB289, § 7.

Sex Offender Registration Act, see section 29-4001.

This section does not violate the constitutional guarantee of equal protection, nor does it violate the constitutional prohibition against cruel and unusual punishment. State v. Ruzicka, 218 Neb. 594, 357 N.W.2d 457 (1984).

Debauching a minor is not a lesser-included offense of pandering. Mingus v. Fairbanks, 211 Neb. 81, 317 N.W.2d 770 (1982).